Hawaii statutes.
§490:1-305 Remedies to be liberally
administered. (a) The remedies provided by this chapter shall be
liberally administered so that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position
as if the other party had fully performed but neither consequential or special
damages nor penal damages may be had except as specifically provided in this
chapter or by other rule of law.

(b) Any right or obligation declared by this
chapter is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a
different and limited effect. [L 2004, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next